Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-537
Sanitary district; activities; discontinuance; election; notice; form of ballot.

Upon filing such a resolution of the trustees or such a petition of the qualified electors with it, it shall be the duty of the county board, at least twenty days prior to the next state election, either primary or general, to submit at such election, after having published a notice of such submission, the question of the discontinuance of the activities and work of such sanitary district to the electors of such sanitary district in the following form: Shall Sanitary Drainage District No. .......... discontinue its activities and work in order that the same shall be carried on by other governmental subdivisions, wholly or partly within the district, as provided by law? The ballots shall be prepared, the election conducted, and the vote canvassed as in county elections.

Laws 1941, c. 56, § 2, p. 255;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 31-631;

Laws 1943, c. 75, § 2, p. 258;

R.S.1943, § 31-537.